Utah statutes.
26-31-1.   Procurement and use of blood, plasma, products and derivatives a
service and not a sale.
The procurement, processing, distribution, or use of whole human blood,
plasma, blood products, and blood derivatives for the purpose of injecting or
transfusing them into the human body together with the process of injecting or
transfusing the same shall be construed to be the rendition of a service by
every person participating therein and shall not be construed to be a sale.
